Utah statutes.
34-23-204.   Permitted occupations for minors 14 or older.

(1)  Minors 14 years of age or older may work in a wide variety of nonhazardous occupations including:

(a)  retail food services;

(b)  automobile service stations, except for the operation of motor vehicles and the use of hoists;

(c)  public messenger service;

(d)  janitorial and custodial service;

(e)  lawn care;

(f)  the use of approved types of vacuum cleaners, floor polishers, power lawn mowers, and sidewalk snow removal equipment; and

(g)  other similar work as approved by the division.

(2)  Minors 14 years of age or older may also work in nonhazardous areas in manufacturing, warehousing and storage, construction, and other such areas not determined harmful by the division.



Amended by Chapter 240, 1996 General Session

